Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-311
Base jurisdiction, defined.

Base jurisdiction means, for purposes of fleet registration, the jurisdiction where the registrant has an established place of business, where miles or kilometers are accrued by the fleet, and where operational records of such fleet are maintained or can be made available.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 11;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB239, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 7.